Colorado, session 2026A, HB1075.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-3-206, amend
(1)(d); and repeal (2) as follows:
26.5-3-206. Colorado child abuse prevention trust fund -
creation - source of funds - appropriation - repeal.
(1) There is created in the state treasury the Colorado child abuse
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

prevention trust fund. The board shall administer the trust fund, which
consists of:
(d) Reimbursement money received for prevention services and
programs identified in the federal Title IV-E prevention services
clearinghouse pursuant to the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act
of 2018". Beginning July 1, 2021, the department shall transmit federal
Title IV-E reimbursements for prevention services to the state treasurer,
who shall credit the reimbursements to the trust fund. BEGINNING JULY 1,
2026, REIMBURSEMENT MONEY RECEIVED FOR PREVENTION SERVICES AND
PROGRAMS FUNDED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD AND
IDENTIFIED IN THE FEDERAL TITLE IV-E PREVENTION SERVICES
CLEARINGHOUSE PURSUANT TO THE FEDERAL "FAMILY FIRST PREVENTION
SERVICES ACT OF 2018". THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL
CLAIM AND TRANSMIT FEDERAL TITLE IV-E REIMBURSEMENTS FOR
PREVENTION SERVICES AND PROGRAMS OFFERED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
EARLY CHILDHOOD TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE
REIMBURSEMENTS TO THE TRUST FUND.
(2) The board shall claim federal Title IV-E reimbursement for the
trust fund for all eligible grants for prevention services on the federal Title
IV-E prevention services clearinghouse.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 26.5-3-209.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-3-208, amend (1)
as follows:
26.5-3-208. Report - repeal.
(1) (a) The department shall contract for an independent evaluation
of the Colorado child abuse prevention trust fund created in section
26.5-3-206, as it existed prior to its repeal on July 1, 2027, including
administrative costs of operating the trust fund and the cost-effectiveness
and the impact of the grants on reducing and preventing child abuse. The
department shall provide a report of the evaluation to the house of
representatives and senate health and human services committees, or any
successor committees, on or before November 1, 2029.
(b) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2030.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1075

SECTION 4. Federal funds. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, the
general assembly anticipates that the department of human services will
receive $150,000 in federal funds to implement this act. This figure is
subject to the "(I)" notation as defined in the annual general appropriation
act for the same fiscal year.
SECTION 5. Effective date. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1075

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1075